Utah statutes.
17-50-329.   Prohibition against regulation of nutritional information dissemination.

(1)  A county may not regulate the dissemination of nutritional information or the content required to be placed on a menu, menu board, or food tag by a restaurant, eating establishment, or other food facility.

(2)  An ordinance or regulation that violates Subsection (1) is void.

